Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF954.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [297A.755] REFUNDS OF TAXES PAID FOR QUALIFYING INDIVIDUALS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Sales tax refund. new text end new text begin A qualifying individual may receive a refund equal to the amount of taxes paid under this chapter in the previous calendar year. For the purposes of this section, a "qualifying individual" is a person who (1) is in advanced stages of an illness that is expected to result in death or to last continually for at least 12 months, (2) receives a disability determination from the United States Social Security Administration or a state medical review team, and (3) receives financial assistance through state or federal disability programs. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin The commissioner must prescribe the form and manner of the application submitted under this section. The application must include sufficient information to permit the commissioner to verify the tax paid and qualifying status. A qualifying individual may submit an application once per calendar year. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to make the refunds in this section is annually appropriated to the commissioner. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end